Alabama, session 2026rs, HB318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
TJ's Law.
Section 2. (a) The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency
(ALEA) shall develop and implement an electronic notification
system by which parents and legal guardians of minors shall
receive notification by reliable electronic means when the
minor under their legal custody is cited for any traffic
infraction.
(b) The Secretary of ALEA shall adopt rules,
restrictions, and eligibility requirements that are necessary
to implement the provisions of this section. At a minimum, the
rules shall include the following provisions:
(1) A parent or legal guardian may enroll in the
electronic notification system by providing sufficient
evidence that the minor is under his or her legal custody.
(2) A parent or legal guardian's access to the
electronic notification system for a minor under the parent or
guardian's legal custody automatically ends once the minor has
reached his or her 19th birthday.
(3) A minor may unenroll a parent or legal guardian
from the electronic notification system upon the submission of
clear evidence that the minor meets one of the following
requirements:
a. The minor is emancipated.
b. The minor is not dependent on a parent or legal
guardian for support and is living apart from his or her
parents or other individual in loco parentis.
Page 2

parents or other individual in loco parentis.
HB318 INTRODUCED
c. The minor is married.
d. The minor having been married is divorced.
e. The minor has borne a child.
(c) The creation and continuation of the electronic
notification system established in this section shall be
contingent upon the availability of funds.
(d) For the purposes of this section, the term "minor"
means an individual under the age of 19.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3